Arkansas, session 2025, HB1516.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 2-40-106 is amended to read as follows:
2-40-106. Examinations and findings.
(a)(1) Any veterinary inspector or other employee duly authorized by
the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Department of Agriculture shall
have the privilege of entering upon any property or premises in this state
for the purpose of examining or testing animals which he or she has reason to
believe are affected with a contagious or infectious disease so as to
constitute a menace to the livestock and poultry of the community.
(2) He or she may call on one (1) or more peace officers. It
shall be their duty to give him or her all assistance in their power.
*CRH137*
02-25-2025 09:22:51 CRH137

As Engrossed: H2/25/25 HB1516
(b)(1) When ordered by the State Veterinarian, owners or persons in
charge of animals shall assemble them at a designated time and place for the
purpose of examining, testing, treating, necropsy, disinfecting, or for any
other purpose.
(2)(A) If after examination of suspected animals the veterinary
inspector shall find them to be affected with any reportable disease, he or
she shall furnish the owner or person in charge of the animals with a report
of his or her findings and with a copy of the existing law and rules of the
commission department in regard to the disease.
(B) Any person who, after notification, shall fail to
comply with the rules shall be guilty of an administrative penalty He or she
shall also be liable for damages to others due to infection from his or her
stock. A person who, after notification, fails to comply with the rules of
the department shall be:
(1) Guilty of a violation and subject to a fine not to exceed
three hundred dollars ($300); and
(2) Liable for the damages to others due to infection from his
or her stock.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code §§ 15-31-113 and 15-31-114 are amended to
read as follows:
15-31-113. Legislative findings — Purpose.
(a) The General Assembly finds:
(1) The Arkansas Forestry Commission Department of Agriculture
enforces laws pertaining to wildland fires, timber theft, and unlawful
dumping on forest land;
(2) Under current law, fines resulting from violations of the
wildland fire laws are deposited with local school districts; and
(3) The law is silent on where to deposit fines resulting from
violations of the dumping and timber theft laws.
(b) The purpose of this section and § 15-31-114 is to establish that
fines generated by law enforcement activities of the commission department be
deposited into the State Forestry Fund Department of Agriculture Law
Enforcement Fund.

15-31-114. Classification of fines.
02-25-2025 09:22:51 CRH137

As Engrossed: H2/25/25 HB1516
Fines deposited into the State Forestry Department of Agriculture Law
Enforcement Fund shall be classified as special revenues.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 19-6-301, concerning the enumeration of
special revenues, is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as
follows:
(276) Fines collected under §§ 15-31-113(b) and 15-31-114.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code Title 19, Chapter 6, Subchapter 8, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
19-6-845. Department of Agriculture Law Enforcement Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Department of Agriculture Law Enforcement Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) The fines collected under § 15-31-113(b) and § 15-31-114;
and
(2) Any other revenues as may be authorized by law.
(c) All fines and penalties resulting from arrests made or citations
issued by Department of Agriculture law enforcement officers deposited into
the fund shall be used exclusively by the department in carrying out the
department’s law enforcement functions, powers, and duties as provided by
law.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code Title 25, Chapter 38, Subchapter 2, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
25-38-213. Award of pistol upon retirement or death.
When a Department of Agriculture law enforcement officer retires from
service or dies while still employed with the department, in recognition of
and appreciation for the service of the retiring or deceased law enforcement
officer, the Secretary of the Department of Agriculture may award the pistol
carried by the law enforcement officer at the time of his or her death or
retirement from service to:
(1) The law enforcement officer; or
(2) If the law enforcement officer is deceased, the law
enforcement officer's spouse if the law enforcement officer's spouse is
02-25-2025 09:22:51 CRH137

As Engrossed: H2/25/25 HB1516
eligible under applicable state and federal laws to possess a firearm.

/s/Richmond

































02-25-2025 09:22:51 CRH137